Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.130

Real property—Sale—Use of proceeds.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5412-S.SL) ***

Except as provided in RCW 28A.335.240(1), the proceeds from any sale of school district real property by a board of directors shall be deposited to the debt service fund and/or the capital projects fund, except for amounts required to be expended for the costs associated with the sale of such property, which moneys may be deposited into the fund from which the expenditure was incurred.

[ 2004 c 6 s 2; 1983 c 59 s 14; 1981 c 250 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 80 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 243 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.58.0461.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—Severability—1983 c 59: See notes following RCW 28A.505.010.

Effective date—1981 c 250: See note following RCW 28A.335.060.

School district funds: RCW 28A.320.330.